Hawaii statutes.
[§480-13.3] Class actions by private
persons. (a) A class action for claims for a violation of this chapter
other than claims for unfair or deceptive acts or practices may be filed, and
may be prosecuted on behalf of indirect purchasers by a person other than the
attorney general as follows:

(1) A filed copy of the complaint and all relevant
supporting and exculpatory materials in possession of the proposed class
representative or its counsel shall be served on the attorney general not later
than seven days after filing of the complaint. The complaint shall be filed in
camera, and shall not be served on the defendant until the court so orders.
The complaint shall remain under seal for at least sixty days after service
upon the attorney general of the complaint and all relevant supporting and
exculpatory materials in possession of the proposed class representative or its
counsel. The defendant named in the complaint shall not be required to respond
to the complaint until twenty days after the complaint has been unsealed and
served upon the defendant in accordance with the Hawaii rules of civil
procedure;

(2) After service upon the attorney general of both
the complaint and the relevant supporting and exculpatory materials in
possession of the proposed class representative or its counsel, the attorney
general may request the proposed class representative or its counsel to provide
other materials deemed necessary by the attorney general;

(3) The attorney general may move the court for
extensions of the sixty-day period, which request shall be granted for good
cause shown. The motion may be supported by affidavits or other submissions in
camera;

(4) The attorney general shall have the sole
discretion to determine whether the State will proceed with the action or file
its own action involving the same or similar claim or claims set forth in the
complaint filed by the proposed class representative, which determination shall
not be subject to review or appeal; and

(5) On or before the expiration of the sixty-day
period or any extensions obtained, the attorney general shall notify the court
of its decision on whether the State will proceed with the action or file its
own action involving the same or similar claim or claims set forth in the
complaint filed by the proposed class representative:

(A) If the State proceeds with the action,
the action shall be conducted by the attorney general and the seal shall be
lifted;

(B) If the State files its own action
involving the same or similar claim or claims set forth in the complaint filed
by the proposed class representative, then the complaint filed by the proposed
class representative shall be dismissed; and

(C) If the State declines or fails to timely
elect to proceed with the action, or declines to file its own action
involving the same or similar claim or claims set forth in the complaint filed
by the proposed class representative, the proposed class representative shall
have the right to conduct the action, and the complaint shall be unsealed and
served upon the defendant by order of court. If the attorney general so
requests, the State shall be served with copies of all pleadings filed in the
action, and shall be supplied with copies of all deposition transcripts at the
State's expense. When the proposed class representative proceeds with the
action, the court without limiting the status and rights of such person may
nevertheless permit the State to intervene at a later date upon showing of good
cause, and upon such terms and conditions that the court deems just.

(b) This section shall not limit the rights of
consumers to bring class actions against any person based on unfair or
deceptive acts or practices declared unlawful by section 480-2. [L 2002, c 229,
§1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next